Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Article 5. School Energy Conservation Program.

§§ 57-39-201 through 57-39-205.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2013, ch. 538, §§ 24 through 26, effective from and after July 1, 2013.

§57-39-201. [Laws, 1984, ch. 463, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 45, eff from and after July 1, 1992.]

§57-39-203. [Laws, 1984, ch. 463, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 46; Laws, 2000, ch. 503, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2000.]

§57-39-205. [Laws, 1984, ch. 463, § 3; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 47, eff from and after July 1, 1992.]